Alabama, session 2026rs, HB52.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
The Light of Justice Act.
Section 2. (a) Notwithstanding Section 6-2-8, Code of
Alabama 1975, any civil claim: (i) for damages resulting from
an injury arising from a sex offense as described in Section
15-20A-5, Code of Alabama 1975; (ii) for which the victim of
the sex offense was under 19 years of age at the time the
offense occurred; and (iii) which was previously time-barred,
is revived and may be commenced within 10 years of the
effective date of this act.
(b) A claim described in subsection (a) may be brought
against both of the following:
(1) The individual alleged to have committed the sex
offense.
(2) Any entity or organization entrusted with the
well-being of minors, the officers or employees of which knew
or should have known of the sexual abuse which is the subject
Page 2

or should have known of the sexual abuse which is the subject
HB52 INTRODUCED
of the claim and failed to take reasonable steps to prevent
it. This subdivision includes, but is not limited to,
religious institutions, private academic institutions, health
care providers, social service agencies, and youth
organizations.
(c) The Attorney General shall develop and implement a
public awareness campaign to inform survivors of sexual abuse
of their rights under this act, including the revived time
period to bring an action under subsection (a) and resources
to assist survivors in pursuing those claims.
(d) No employer, institution, or other entity may
retaliate against any individual for filing a claim under this
act.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027, contingent on the ratification of an amendment to the
Constitution of Alabama of 2022, proposed in the 2026 Regular
Session, authorizing the Legislature to revive rights and
remedies relating to sexual abuse of a minor.
Page 3